lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Sandėliavimas ir tvarkymas > Drabužiai ir sandėliavimas spintoje: Įkrovimo padėklai; Spintų dėklai ir drabužių lentynos; Drabužių stovai; Drabužių laikymo krepšiai; Pakabos; Skrybėlių dėžutės; Batų lentynos ir laikikliai; Daiktadėžė po lova
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Lagring og organisering > Kles- og skaplagring: Ladestasjoner; Skaporganisering og klesstativer; Klesstasjoner; Lagringsposer til tøy; Hengere; Hattebokser; Skostativer og -organisering; Oppbevaring under sengen
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 수납/정리용품 > 붙박이장/의류 수납함: 칸막이 정리함; 붙박이장 정리함/옷걸이; 옷 행거; 의류 보관 가방; 옷걸이; 모자 보관함; 신발장/신발 정리대; 침대 밑 수납함
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Uskladnění a uspořádání > Uskladnění oblečení: Nabíjecí skříňky; Police na oblečení; Stojany na oblečení; Úložné obaly na oděvy; Ramínka; Krabice na klobouky; Regály na obuv a botníky; Úložné prostory pod postel
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Съхранение и организация > Съхранение на дрехи и дрешници: Органайзери със станции за зареждане; Органайзери за дрешници и стелажи за дрехи; Стойки за дрехи; Чанти за съхранение на дрехи; Закачалки; Кутии за шапки; Стелажи и органайзери за обувки; Съхранение под леглото
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Đồ chứa và dụng cụ sắp xếp đồ > Cất giữ đồ đạc và quần áo: Ngăn đựng đồ; Giá và khung treo quần áo; Cây treo quần áo; Túi Đựng Quần Áo; Móc treo quần áo; Hộp đựng mũ; Tủ và giá để giày dép; Ngăn chứa đồ dưới gầm giường
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Armazenamento e organização > Roupas e armazenamento de roupas: Mesinhas com carregador de dispositivos; Cabideiros de vestidos; Cabideiros de roupas; Sacos para armazenamento de roupas; Cabides; Caixas para chapéu; Prateleiras e armários para sapatos; Armazenamento sob a cama
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Förvaring och organisation > Kläd- och garderobsförvaring: Laddningslådor; Garderobslösningar och klädhängare; Herrbetjänter; Klädpåsar; Galgar; Hattaskar; Skoställ och skohyllor; Förvaring under sängen
da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Opbevaring og organisering > Tøj- og klædeskabe: Opladningskasser; Tøjstativer; Tøjopbevaring; Opbevaringstasker til tøj; Bøjler; Hatteæsker; Skoopbevaring; Opbevaring under sengen
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Tárolás és rendezés > Ruha- és szekrénytárolás: Töltőállomások; Szekrényrendezők és ruhatartók; Szobainasok; Ruhatároló zsákok; Akasztók; Kalapdobozok; Cipőállványok és -rendezők; Ágy alatti tárolók
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Depozitare și organizare > Depozitare haine și depozitare pentru dressing: Suporturi pentru încărcare; Organizatoare pentru dressinguri și suporturi pentru haine; Suporturi pentru haine; Huse pentru depozitarea hainelor; Umerașe; Cutii pentru pălării; Suporturi și organizatoare pentru încălțăminte; Depozitare sub pat
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Organización y almacenamiento > Almacenamiento de ropa y armarios: Organizadores con cargadores; Organizadores de vestidores y perchas de barra; Galanes de noche; Fundas para ropa; Perchas; Cajas para sombreros; Zapateros y organizadores de calzado; Contenedores de guardado bajo la cama
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Αποθήκευση & οργάνωση > Αποθήκευση ρούχων & ντουλαπιών: Υποδοχές φόρτισης; Οργανωτές ντουλαπιών & κρεμάστρες ρούχων; Βοηθήματα αποθήκευσης ρούχων; Θήκες αποθήκευσης ρούχων; Κρεμάστρες; Κουτιά καπέλων; Ράφια & οργανωτές υποδημάτων; Αποθήκευση κάτω από το κρεβάτι
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Storage & Organization > Clothing & Closet Storage: Charging Valets; Closet Organizers & Garment Racks; Clothes Valets; Garment Storage Bags; Hangers; Hat Boxes; Shoe Racks & Organizers; Underbed Storage
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Armazenamento e organização > Roupa e armazenamento de armário: Valets de carregamento; Organizadores e armário e prateleiras de vestuário; Valets de vestuário; Sacos para guardar roupa; Cabides; Caixas para chapéus; Prateleiras e organizadores para calçado; Arrumação debaixo da cama
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > การจัดเก็บและการจัดระเบียบ > ที่จัดระเบียบเสื้อผ้าและตู้เสื้อผ้า: แท่นชาร์จ; ที่จัดระเบียบตู้เสื้อผ้าและชั้นวางเสื้อผ้า; หิ้งเสื้อผ้า; ถุงเก็บเสื้อผ้า; ไม้แขวนเสื้อ; กล่องหมวก; ชั้นและที่จัดระเบียบรองเท้า; ที่เก็บของใต้เตียง
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Przechowywanie i utrzymanie porządku > Przechowywanie ubrań: Pudełka na ładowarki; Organizery do szaf i stojaki na odzież; Wieszaki stojące na ubrania; Pokrowce na ubrania; Wieszaki; Pudełka na kapelusze; Stojaki i pojemniki na buty; Schowki pod łóżko
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Saklama ve Düzenleme > Elbise Dolapları ve Yüklükler: Çekmeceli Şarj İstasyonları; Dolap Düzenleyiciler ve Askılıklar; Kıyafet Çekmeceleri; Giysi Saklama Torbaları; Elbise Askıları; Şapka Kutuları; Ayakkabı Raf ve Düzenleyicileri; Yatak Altı Depolama Kutuları
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 储物/收纳 > 服装/衣柜收纳: 充电座; 衣柜收纳用品/衣架; 衣物架; 衣物收纳袋; 衣架; 帽子收纳盒; 鞋架/鞋子收纳; 床底收纳
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Rangement et organisation > Rangements pour armoires à vêtements: Valets de chargement; Organiseurs pour armoires et penderies pour vêtements; Valets de nuit; Sacs de rangement pour vêtements; Cintres; Boîtes à chapeaux; Etagères et casiers à chaussures; Rangement sous le lit
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 儲藏和收納 > 服裝收納: 充電台; 衣櫥收納架; 懸掛式衣架; 衣物收納袋; 衣架; 帽盒; 鞋架; 床底收納空間
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Varasto ja säilytys > Vaatesäilytys: Vaatteidenvaihtotelineet; Kaappien säilytysratkaisut ja vaaterekit; Vaatetelineet; Vaatteiden säilytyspussit; Vaateripustimet; Hattulaatikot; Kenkätelineet ja -hyllyt; Säilytystila sängyn alla
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > 収納 > 衣類収納用品: 充電スタンド; ハンガーラック; バレットスタンド; ガーメント収納バッグ; ハンガー; 帽子箱; シューズラック; ベッド下収納
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Odlaganje i organizacija > Skladištenje odjeće i ormari: Držači za punjenje; Organizatori ormara i stalci za odjeću; Šipke za odjeću; Vreće za spremanje odjeće; Vješalice; Kutije za šešire; Police i organizatori za cipele; Pohrana ispod kreveta
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Shranjevanje in organizacija > Shranjevanje oblačil in organizacijo omar: Stojala za polnjenje; Organizatorji omar in stojala za oblačila; Stojala za oblačila; Vreče za shranjevanje oblačil; Obešalniki; Škatle za klobuke; Stojala in organizatorji za čevlje; Shranjevanje pod posteljo
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Хранение вещей > Хранение одежды и обуви: Органайзеры с зарядной станцией; Системы хранения и напольные вешалки; Костюмные вешалки; Сумки для хранения одежды; Плечики; Коробки для шляп; Обувницы и органайзеры для обуви; Подкроватное хранилище
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Skladovanie a organizácia > Skladovanie odevov v šatníkoch: Nabíjacie stanice; Šatníkové organizéry a stojany na odevy; Nemý sluha; Úložné tašky na oblečenie; Vešiaky; Škatule na klobúky; Stojany a organizéry obuvi; Úložný priestor pod posteľou
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Opruimen en organiseren > Kleding en kledingopslag: Oplaadstations; Deurhangers voor kleding; Kledingstandaards; Opslagzakken voor kleding; Kleerhangers; Hoedendozen; Rekken en opbergsystemen voor schoenen; Opbergboxen voor onder het bed
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Aufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme > Kleider- & Wandschrankaufbewahrung: Organizer mit Ladestation; Schrank-Organizer & Kleiderständer; Herrendiener; Kleideraufbewahrungstaschen; Kleiderbügel; Hutschachteln; Schuhregale & -schränke; Bettkästen
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Immagazzinamento e organizzazione > Abbigliamento e sistemazione negli armadi: Portatutto; Stand appendiabiti e organizer per armadi; Omini; Sacche copriabiti; Appendiabiti; Scatole per cappelli; Scarpiere e organizer per scarpe; Contenitori sottoletto